Utah statutes.
11-42-208.   Recording notice of deletion if property is deleted from an
assessment area.
If, after adoption of a designation resolution or ordinance under Section
11-42-206, a local entity deletes property from the assessment area, the local
entity shall record a notice of deletion in a form that includes the legal
description and tax identification number of the property and otherwise
complies with applicable recording statutes.
